Connecticut, session 2026, SB00466.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subdivision (6) of subsection (b) of section 1-206 of the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(6) Notwithstanding any provision of this subsection, a public agency
may petition the commission for relief from a requester that the public
agency alleges is a vexatious requester. Such petition shall be sworn
under penalty of false statement, as provided in section 53a-157b, and
shall detail the conduct which the agency alleges demonstrates a
vexatious history of requests, or harassing or threatening conduct,
including, but not limited to: (A) The number of requests filed and the
total number of pending requests; (B) the scope of the requests; (C) the
nature, content, language or subject matter of the requests; (D) the
nature, content, language or subject matter of other oral and written
SB466 / File No. 572 1

SB466 File No. 572
communications to the agency or an employee of the agency from the
requester, including, but not limited to, threatening or harassing
conduct that took place at or outside of the agency's office regardless of
whether such conduct was related to the request; and (E) a pattern of
conduct that amounts to an abuse of the right to access information
under the Freedom of Information Act or an interference with the
operation of the agency. Upon receipt of such petition, the executive
director of the commission shall review the petition and determine
whether it warrants a hearing. If the executive director determines that
a hearing is not warranted, the executive director shall recommend that
the commission deny the petition without a hearing. The commission
shall vote at its next regular meeting after such recommendation to
accept or reject such recommendation and, after such meeting, shall
issue a written explanation of the reasons for such acceptance or
rejection. If the executive director determines that a hearing is
warranted, the commission shall serve upon all parties, by certified or
registered mail or electronic transmission, a copy of such petition
together with any other notice or order of the commission. The
commission shall, after due notice to the parties, hear and either grant
or deny the petition not later than one year after its filing. Upon a grant
of such petition, the commission may provide appropriate relief
commensurate with the vexatious conduct, including, but not limited
to, an order that the agency need not comply with future requests from
the vexatious requester for a specified period of time determined by the
commission, but for a first granting of such petition concerning a
requester, not to exceed one year, and for a second or subsequent
granting of such petition concerning a requester, not to exceed three
years. Any party aggrieved by the commission's granting of such
petition may apply to the superior court for the judicial district in which
the public agency is located, not later than fifteen days after the
commission meeting at which such petition was granted, for an order
reversing the commission's decision.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
SB466 / File No. 572 2

SB466 File No. 572
Section 1 October 1, 2026 1-206(b)(6)
GAE Joint Favorable
SB466 / File No. 572 3

SB466 File No. 572
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill expands public agencies' ability to seek relief from the
Freedom of Information Commission (FOIC) against a vexatious
requester and increases to three years the maximum period during
which agencies may deny FOIA requests from a vexatious requester, if
permitted by FOIC. The bill results in no fiscal impact to the state or
municipalities, as it is not expected to result in savings associated with
FOIA request workload.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
SB466 / File No. 572 4

SB466 File No. 572
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 466
AN ACT CONCERNING VEXATIOUS REQUESTERS UNDER THE
FREEDOM OF INFORMATION ACT.